Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-670
Research project; department; review.

The approved researcher shall submit the reports or results of the research project to the department. The department shall review such reports or results and shall prohibit publication of confidential information. The approved researcher shall acknowledge the department and its medical record and health information registries in any publication in which information obtained from the medical record and health information registries is used.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 8.